Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1229
Bridge commission; bids required; when.

No contract or agreement for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, enlargement, extension, renewal, replacement or equipment of such bridges exceeding in amount the sum of twenty-five hundred dollars shall be made without advertisement for bids, which shall be opened publicly, and an award made to the best bidder, with power in the commission to reject any or all bids.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 14, p. 624;

C.S.1929, § 14-1214;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 3, p. 112;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1214;

R.S.1943, § 14-1229.